Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1508
Operator, defined.

Operator shall mean a person in control of or having responsibility for the daily operation of a tank. Operator shall not include a person described in subsection (2) of section 66-1509.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 3.